sv: Standard för sändningsvideo: Multistandard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dubbel); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dubbel); SECAM; Övrigt
es: Estándar de video de transmisión: Multiestándar; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dual); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dual); SECAM; Otros
lt-LT: Transliavimo vaizdo standartas: Daugelio standartų; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dvigubas); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dvigubas); SECAM; Kita
it: Standard video di trasmissione: Multi-standard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dual); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dual); SECAM; Altro
cs: Vysílací video standard: Multistandard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (duální); PAL; PAL/SECAM (duální); SECAM; Jiné
da: Tv-transmissions-videostandard: Multistandard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dual); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dual); SECAM; Andet
pl: Standard nadawania wideo: Wielostandardowy; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (podwójny); PAL; PAL/SECAM (podwójny); SECAM; Inne
nl: Uitzend videostandaard: Multistandaard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (duaal); PAL; PAL/SECAM (duaal); SECAM; Andere
fi: Lähetysvideostandardi: Monistandardi; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (kaksi); PAL; PAL/SECAM (kaksi); SECAM; Muu
hr-HR: Standard emitiranja videa: Multistandard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dualni); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dualni); SECAM; Ostalo
th: มาตรฐานวิดีโอออกอากาศ: หลายมาตรฐาน; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (สองระบบ); PAL; PAL/SECAM (สองระบบ); SECAM; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Standard video oddajanja: Več standardov; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dvojni); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dvojni); SECAM; Drugo
vi: Tiêu chuẩn video phát sóng: Đa chuẩn; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (kép); PAL; PAL/SECAM (kép); SECAM; Khác
el: Πρότυπο μετάδοσης βίντεο: Πολλαπλά πρότυπα; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (διπλό); PAL; PAL/SECAM (διπλό); SECAM; Άλλο
ru: Стандарт вещания видео: Мультистандарт; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (двойной); PAL; PAL/SECAM (двойной); SECAM; Другой
ro-RO: Standard video de difuzare: Multi-standard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dual); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dual); SECAM; Altele
nb: Kringkastings videostandard: Multistandard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dobbel); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dobbel); SECAM; Annet
fr: Norme de diffusion vidéo: Multi-standard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (double); PAL; PAL/SECAM (double); SECAM; Autre
pt-BR: Padrão de vídeo de transmissão: Multissistema; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dual); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dual); SECAM; Outro
ja: 放送ビデオ規格: マルチスタンダード; NTSC; NTSC/PAL（デュアル）; PAL; PAL/SECAM（デュアル）; SECAM; その他
hu: Műsorszórási videószabvány: Többszabványú; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (kettős); PAL; PAL/SECAM (kettős); SECAM; Egyéb
en: Broadcast video standard: Multi-standard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (dual); PAL; PAL/SECAM (dual); SECAM; Other
bg-BG: Стандарт за излъчване на видео: Мулти-стандарт; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (двоен); PAL; PAL/SECAM (двоен); SECAM; Други
zh-TW: 廣播視訊標準: 多制式; NTSC; NTSC/PAL（雙制式）; PAL; PAL/SECAM（雙制式）; SECAM; 其他
ko: 방송 비디오 표준: 멀티 표준; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (듀얼); PAL; PAL/SECAM (듀얼); SECAM; 기타
tr: Yayın video standardı: Çoklu standart; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (ikili); PAL; PAL/SECAM (ikili); SECAM; Diğer
zh-CN: 广播视频标准: 多制式; NTSC; NTSC/PAL（双制式）; PAL; PAL/SECAM（双制式）; SECAM; 其他
pt-PT: Padrão de vídeo de transmissão: Multi-padrão; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (duplo); PAL; PAL/SECAM (duplo); SECAM; Outro
sk-SK: Norma vysielania videa: Multištandardný; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (duálny); PAL; PAL/SECAM (duálny); SECAM; Iné
de: Sendevideostandard: Multi-Standard; NTSC; NTSC/PAL (Dual); PAL; PAL/SECAM (Dual); SECAM; Sonstiges